apertium-lat.lat.dix
    <pardef n="terrest/er__adj">
        <e><p><l>er</l>                 <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ris</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>rem</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ris</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ri</l>                <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ri</l>                <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>res</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>res</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>res</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>rium</l>              <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ribus</l>             <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ribus</l>             <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>er</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ris</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>rem</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ris</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ri</l>                <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ri</l>                <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>res</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>res</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>res</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>rium</l>              <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ribus</l>             <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ribus</l>             <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>re</l>                <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>re</l>                <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>re</l>                <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ris</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ri</l>                <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ri</l>                <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ria</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ria</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ria</l>               <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>rium</l>              <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ribus</l>             <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ribus</l>             <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paradigm">
      <e>       <p><l>NON_ANALYSIS</l>          <r>DUE_TO_LT_PROC_HANG</r></p></e>
           <e>
             <p>
               <l></l>
               <r></r>
             </p>
           </e>    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pulch/er__adj">
      <e><p><l>ro</l>      <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ri</l>       <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rum</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ris</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rorum</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ris</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ros</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rae</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rae</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ram</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ris</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rarum</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ris</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ras</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rae</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rum</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rum</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ris</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rorum</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ris</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Numerals -->

    <e lm="terrester"><i>terrest</i><par n="terrest/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "adulter" ><i>adult</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "aeripes" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "aestifer" ><i>aestif</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "alter" ><i>alt</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "antefero" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "ater" ><i>at</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "augurale" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "bifer" ><i>bif</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "caelifer" ><i>caelif</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "campester" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "cervical" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "cometes" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "coniger" ><i>conig</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "coquus" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "creber" ><i>creb</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "defraudo" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "discrimen" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "epos" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "exter" ><i>ext</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "faber" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "fatifer" ><i>fatif</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "fragmen" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "hastile" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "hederiger" ><i>hederig</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "ignifer" ><i>ignif</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "impiger" ><i>impig</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "indignor" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "interpretor" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "lacer" ><i>lac</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "lasarpicifer" ><i>lasarpicif</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "letifer" ><i>letif</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "levamen" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "macer" ><i>mac</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "Maeander" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "mentior" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "mortifer" ><i>mortif</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "munimen" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "nundinor" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "odorifer" ><i>odorif</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "os" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pacifer" ><i>pacif</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "percontatio" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "pomifer" ><i>pomif</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "praevehor" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "repetundae" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "ruber" ><i>rub</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "scaber" ><i>scab</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "sinapi" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "somnifer" ><i>somnif</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "tener" ><i>ten</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "testificor" ><i>placeholder</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "umbrifer" ><i>umbrif</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "vester" ><i>vest</i><par n="pulch/er__adj"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm= "villicus" ><i>stem</i><par n="paradigm"/></e>
